District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0076.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
be cited as the “Certificate of Assurance Moratorium Congressional Review Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective July 17, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-10; D.C.
Official Code § 42-3501.01 et seq.), is amended by adding a new section 221a to read as follows:
“Sec. 221a. Certificate of assurance moratorium.
“Notwithstanding the requirements of section 221, beginning on November 2, 2020, no
owner of a housing accommodation shall request a certificate of assurance, and the Mayor shall
not issue a certificate of assurance for any request received.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2